Missouri, session 2026, SB1183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 115, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 115.645, to read as
follows:
115.645. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Creator", any person that utilizes or deploys
artificial intelligence or other digital technology to
generate synthetic media, but does not include a provider or
a developer of any technology used in the creation of
synthetic media;
(2) "Deceptive and fraudulent deepfake", synthetic
media that provides false information to voters about where,
when, or how they can lawfully vote or depicts a candidate
or political party with the intent to injure the reputation
of the candidate or party and otherwise deceive a voter that:
(a) Appears to a reasonable person to depict a real
individual saying or doing something that did not actually
occur; or
(b) Provides a reasonable person a fundamentally
different understanding or impression of the appearance,

SB 1183 2
action, or speech of a candidate or party than such person
would have from an unaltered, original version of the image,
audio recording, or video recording;
(3) "Synthetic media", an image, audio recording, or
video recording of an individual's appearance, speech, or
conduct that has been created or intentionally manipulated
with the use of generative adversarial network techniques or
other digital artificial intelligence technology in a manner
to create a realistic but false image, audio, or video.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
a creator shall not, within eighteen weeks of an election,
distribute a synthetic media message that the creator knows
or should have known is a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake.
3. (1) The provisions of subsection 2 of this section
shall not apply if the creator of the audio or visual media
includes a disclosure stating: "This _______ has been
manipulated or generated by artificial intelligence.".
(2) The blank shall be filled in with whichever of the
following terms most accurately describes the media: image,
video, or audio.
(3) For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall
appear in a size no smaller than the largest font size of
other text appearing in the visual media. If the visual
media does not include any other text, the disclosure shall
appear in a size that is easily readable by the average
viewer. For visual media in video format, the disclosure
shall appear for the duration of the video.
(4) If the media consists of audio only, and no visual
disclosure is feasible, the disclosure shall be read in a
clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily
heard by the average listener at the beginning of the audio,
at the end of the audio, and, if the audio is greater than

SB 1183 3
two minutes in length, interspersed within the audio at
intervals not to exceed two minutes in length.
4. A candidate whose appearance, action, or speech is
depicted through the use of a deceptive and fraudulent
deepfake in violation of subsection 2 of this section may
seek injunctive or other equitable relief from the creator
prohibiting the publication of such deceptive and fraudulent
deepfake.
5. A person who violates the provisions of subsection
2 of this section may be subject to the following penalties:
(1) A class B misdemeanor;
(2) A class A misdemeanor if the person commits the
violation with the intent to cause violence or bodily harm;
(3) A class E felony if the person commits the
violation within five years of one or more prior convictions
under this section; or
(4) A civil penalty no less than one thousand dollars
per the first violation and not to exceed five million
dollars for any subsequent violation.
6. Any individual who has been harmed by violations of
the provisions of this section may bring a private civil
action in the court of competent jurisdiction.
7. This section shall not apply to a radio or
television broadcasting station, including a cable or
satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, that
broadcasts a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake prohibited by
this section as part of a bona fide newscast, news
interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot coverage of bona
fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges
through content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be
easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, that

SB 1183 4
there are questions about the authenticity of the materially
deceptive audio or visual media.
8. This section shall not apply to a radio or
television broadcasting station, including a cable or
satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, or
website developer or owner, when it is paid to broadcast a
deceptive and fraudulent deepfake. The responsibility and
liability shall rest solely with the advertiser or entity
that paid to broadcast the deceptive and fraudulent deepfake
and not with the radio or television broadcasting station or
website developer or owner disseminating the deceptive or
fraudulent deepfake.
9. This section shall not apply to an internet website
or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other
periodical of general circulation, including an internet or
electronic publication, that routinely carries news and
commentary of general interest and that publishes a
deceptive and fraudulent deepfake prohibited by this section
if the publication clearly states that the audio or visual
100 media does not accurately represent the speech or conduct of
101 the candidate.
102 10. This section shall not apply to an interactive
103 computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 230, for
104 content provided by another party.
105 11. This section shall not apply to materially
106 deceptive audio or visual media that constitutes satire or
107 parody.
✓